Texas statutes.
PROPERTY CODE

TITLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 2. NATURE OF PROPERTY

Sec. 2.001. MANUFACTURED HOUSING. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a manufactured home is personal property.

(b) A manufactured home is real property if:

(1) the statement of ownership and location for the home issued under Section 1201.207, Occupations Code, reflects that the owner has elected to treat the home as real property; and

(2) a certified copy of the statement of ownership and location has been filed in the real property records in the county in which the home is located.

(c) In this section, "consumer," "document of title," "first retail sale," "manufactured home," and "mobile home" have the meanings assigned by Chapter 1201, Occupations Code.

(d) to (h) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 338, Sec. 52(2).

(i) This section does not require a retailer or retailer's agent to obtain a license under Chapter 1101, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 978, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1055, Sec. 5, eff. Jan. 1, 2002; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 338, Sec. 41 to 43, 52(2), eff. June 18, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.802, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 2.002. DRY FIRE HYDRANTS: AGREEMENT IS PERSONAL. (a) An agreement between an owner, lessee, or occupant of real property and a fire-fighting agency relating to the connection of a dry fire hydrant to a source of water on the property or the installation of a dry fire hydrant on the property may not bind a subsequent owner, lessee, or occupant of the real property.

(b) In this section:

(1) "Dry fire hydrant" means a fire hydrant that is connected to a stock tank, pond, or other similar source of water from which water is pumped in case of fire.

(2) "Fire-fighting agency" means any entity that provides fire-fighting services, including:

(A) a volunteer fire department; and

(B) a political subdivision of this state authorized to provide fire-fighting services.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 437, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.